New York, session 2025-2026, A4607.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the New York state office of parks, 2 recreation and historic preservation is hereby authorized to create a 3 temporary state commission, hereafter referred to as the commission, to 4 rename the Robert Moses State Park located in Long Island. Such commis- 5 sion shall choose a name that clearly reflects the history of Long 6 Island. 7 § 2. (a) The commission shall consist of nine members, to be appointed 8 as follows: three members to be appointed by the commissioner of the New 9 York state office of parks, recreation and historic preservation; one 10 member to be appointed by the temporary president of the senate; one 11 member to be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; one member to be 12 appointed by the minority leader of the senate; one member to be 13 appointed by the minority leader of the assembly; one member to be 14 appointed by the Suffolk county executive; and one member to be 15 appointed by the governor. Vacancies in the membership of the commission 16 and among its officers shall be filled in the manner provided for 17 original appointments or designations. Such appointments shall be made 18 within six months of the effective date of this act. 19 (b) The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for 20 their services, but shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses 21 incurred in the performance of their duties under this act. 22 (c) All departments or agencies of the state or subdivisions thereof 23 shall, at the request of the commission, provide such facilities, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06732-01-5 A. 4607 2 1 assistance, and data as will enable the commission to carry out its 2 powers and duties. 3 § 3. (a) For the accomplishment of its purposes, the commission may 4 meet and hold hearings within or without the state. The commission is 5 authorized and empowered to undertake any studies, inquiries, surveys or 6 analyses it may deem relevant through its own personnel or in cooper- 7 ation with or by agreement with any other public or private agency. 8 (b) To the maximum extent feasible, the commission may request and 9 shall be entitled to receive and shall utilize and be provided with such 10 facilities, resources and data from any court in the state and from any 11 subdivision, department, board, bureau, commission, office, agency or 12 other instrumentality of the state or of any political subdivision ther- 13 eof as it deems necessary or desirable for the proper execution of its 14 powers and duties and to effectuate the purposes set forth in this act. 15 (c) The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into 16 any agreements and to do and perform any acts that may be necessary, 17 desirable or proper to carry out the purposes and objectives of this 18 act. 19 § 4. (a) The commission shall make and submit their name recommenda- 20 tions to the commissioner of the New York state office of parks, recre- 21 ation and historic preservation, the temporary president of the senate, 22 the speaker of the assembly and the Suffolk county executive. Such 23 recommendations shall be made within six months after all members of the 24 commission have been appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of section 25 two of this act. 26 (b) Once such recommendations are received and decided upon, the 27 commissioner of the New York state office of parks, recreation and 28 historic preservation shall take all necessary steps to proceed with 29 such renaming. 30 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 31 deemed repealed on the first day next succeeding the date of the renam- 32 ing of the Robert Moses State Park as required under this act; and 33 provided further, however, that the commissioner of the New York state 34 office of parks, recreation and historic preservation shall notify the 35 legislative bill drafting commission upon the renaming of the Robert 36 Moses State Park as required under this act in order that the commission 37 may maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official 38 text of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effecting 39 the provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of 40 the public officers law.